Massachusetts, session 194th, S1719.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after line 671, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the following paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish without charge to the owner of a private passenger motor
vehicle who is a parent, child or spouse of a police officer of a police department of any city or
town, the department of state police or the Massachusetts bay transportation authority police
department, who has been killed in the line of duty, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence to
the registrar, a distinctive registration plate that reads "Blue Star Family" for 1 private passenger
motor vehicle owned and principally used by that person or a distinctive "Blue Star Family"
emblem to be affixed to a registration plate for a motorcycle privately owned and principally
used by that person. The registrar may issue a distinctive "Blue Star Family" registration of up to
6 characters for 1 private passenger motor vehicle owned and principally used by that person. A
police officer shall be determined to have been killed in the line of duty for purposes of this
of 4

paragraph if the circumstance meets those which would make them eligible to be placed on the
National Law Enforcement Memorial in Washington D.C.
SECTION 2. Section 7C of Chapter 89 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection 2(c) in its entirety and inserting in
place thereof:-
(c) Violation of this section may be punished by a fine of $250 for a first offense, by a
fine of $500 for a second offense, and by a fine of $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense;
provided that any violation that results in injury to another person may be punished by a fine of
$2,500 or up to one year in jail or house of correction.
And further, by adding the following sections:-
(d) In addition to any fines pursuant to subsection (c), an operator who commits a second
or third offense shall be required to complete a program selected by the registrar of motor
vehicles that encourages a change in driver behavior and attitude about the "Move Over Law".
(e) A first or second offense under this section shall not be a surchargeable incident under
section 113B of chapter 175 or under motor vehicle liability policy as defined in section 34A that
is issued pursuant to said chapter 175; provided, however, that a third or subsequent offense shall
be a surchargeable incident under said section 113B of said chapter 175 or under a motor vehicle
liability policy as defined in said section 34A that is issued pursuant to said chapter 175.
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, upon receipt of the
payment of fines issued under this section, the state comptroller shall immediately cause not less
than 50% of the total to be transferred to registry of motor vehicles to be held as retained
of 4

revenue, provided said revenue shall be used to defray the 100 per cent of the annual cost
associated with section 1 of this act, and further, the remaining balance shall be transferred to the
state treasurer to supplement costs associated with section 3 of this act.
SECTION 3. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 35SSS the following section:-
Section 35TTT. There shall be established and set up on the books of the Commonwealth
a separate fund to be known as the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial Fund to be used
without appropriation by a department of public safety for the purpose of making annual
payments to the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial to memorialize and honor
Massachusetts law enforcement personnel killed in the line of duty. There shall be credited to the
fund revenues received by the Commonwealth from the sale of registration plates under section
2G of chapter 90.
SECTION 4. Section 18¾ of Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
(10) to develop and implement a statewide blue alert system to be activated when law
enforcement officials are searching for an individual who is wanted in the serious injury or
killing of a police officer, state trooper, or other law enforcement official.
SECTION 5. Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 18AA the following section:-
Section 19B. The executive office of public safety shall coordinate the implementation of
a statewide blue alert system, pursuant to section 21 of chapter 22.
of 4

SECTION 6. Chapter 22 of The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition
are hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 21.
THE STATEWIDE BLUE ALERT SYSTEM
Section 1. The following terms as used in this chapter shall, unless the context clearly
appears otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Executive office”, the executive office of public safety.
"Law enforcement agency", a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
investigation of a crime resulting in the serious injury or death of a police officer, state trooper,
or other law enforcement official.
of 4